Wisconsin, session 2025, AB876.
do enact as follows:AB876,14Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 5insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB876,25Section 2. 20.255 (2) (dv) of the statutes is created to read:AB876,2,7620.255 (2) (dv) Energy efficiency projects; grants. The amounts in the 7schedule for grants to school districts under s. 115.457.AB876,38Section 3. 115.457 of the statutes is created to read:AB876,2,119115.457 Energy efficiency projects; grants. (1) Beginning in the 2025-102026 school year, the department shall award grants to school districts for energy 11efficiency projects in school buildings.AB876,2,1412(2) In awarding grants under this section for the 2025-26 and 2026-27 school 13years, the department shall give preference to projects that relate to heating, 14ventilation, and air conditioning systems.AB876,2,1515(3) The department may promulgate rules to implement this section.AB876,416Section 4. 119.04 (1) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Acts 42 17and 79, is amended to read:AB876,3,818119.04 (1) Subchapters IV, V and VII of ch. 115, ch. 121 and ss. 66.0235 (3) (c), 1966.0603 (1m) to (3), 115.01 (1) and (2), 115.28, 115.31, 115.33, 115.34, 115.343, 20115.345, 115.363, 115.364, 115.365 (3), 115.366, 115.367, 115.38 (2), 115.415, 21115.445, 115.457, 118.001 to 118.04, 118.045, 118.06, 118.07, 118.075, 118.076, 22118.10, 118.12, 118.124, 118.125 to 118.14, 118.145 (4), 118.15, 118.153, 118.16, 23118.162, 118.163, 118.164, 118.18, 118.19, 118.196, 118.20, 118.223, 118.225, 1118.24 (1), (2) (c) to (f), (6), (8), and (10), 118.245, 118.25, 118.255, 118.291, 118.292, 2118.293, 118.2935, 118.30 to 118.43, 118.46, 118.50, 118.51, 118.52, 118.53, 118.55, 3118.56, 118.58, 120.12 (2m), (4m), (5), (15) to (27), and (29), 120.125, 120.13 (1), (2) 4(b) to (g), (3), (14), (17) to (19), (26), (34), (35), (37), (37m), and (38), 120.137, 120.14, 5120.20, 120.21 (3), and 120.25 are applicable to a 1st class city school district and 6board but not, unless explicitly provided in this chapter or in the terms of a 7contract, to the commissioner or to any school transferred to an opportunity schools 8and partnership program.AB876,3,99